Alaska, session 34, SB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 21.36 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 21.36.497. Non-network health insurance claims. A health care insurer 05 shall reimburse a non-network health care provider for a health care service or supply 06 in an amount that is at least 75 percent of the median reimbursement rate paid to a 07 network health care provider for the same health care service or supply based on the 08 health care insurer's network rates in the state at the time of delivery of the health care 09 service or supply. In this section, "health care insurer" has the meaning given in 10 AS 21.54.500. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.